Nebraska, session 109, LB180.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
Section 1. Section 73-101, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024,
is amended to read:
73-101 Whenever the State of Nebraska, or any department or any agency
thereof, any county board, county clerk, county highway superintendent, the
mayor and city council or commissioner of any municipality, any entity created
pursuant to the Interlocal Cooperation Act or the Joint Public Agency Act, or
the officers of any school district, township, or other governmental
subdivision, shall advertise for bids in pursuance of any statutes of the State
of Nebraska, on any road contract work or any public improvements work, or for
supplies, construction, repairs, and improvements, and in all other cases where
bids for supplies or work, of any character whatsoever, are received for the
various departments and agencies of the state, and other subdivisions and
agencies enumerated in this section, they shall fix not only the day upon which
such bids shall be returned, received, or opened, as provided by other
statutes, but shall also fix the hour at which such bids shall close, or be
received or opened, and they shall also provide that such bids shall be
immediately and simultaneously opened in the presence of the bidders, or
representatives of the bidders, when the hour is reached for the bids to close.
Such bids may be withheld from disclosure until an intent to award is issued.
If bids are being opened on more than one contract, the officials having in
charge of the opening of such bids may, if they deem it advisable, award each
contract as the bids are opened. Sections 73-101 to 73-106 shall not apply to
the State Park System Construction Alternatives Act, the Public Water and
Natural Resources Project Contracting Act, or sections 39-2808 to 39-2823.
Sec. 2. Section 73-813, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
73-813 (1) Subject to review by the Director of Administrative Services,
the division shall provide procedures to grant limited exceptions from sections
73-807, 73-815, and 73-816 for:
(a) Sole source contracts, emergency contracts, and contracts when the
price has been established by the federal General Services Administration or
competitively bid by another state or group of states, a group of states and
any political subdivision of any other state, a political subdivision of
another state, or a cooperative purchasing organization on behalf of a group of
states or political subdivisions of other states; and
(b) Other circumstances or specific contracts when any of the requirements
of sections 73-807, 73-815, and 73-816 are not appropriate for or are not
compatible with the circumstances or contract. The division shall provide a
written rationale which shall be kept on file when granting an exception under
this subdivision.
(2) The following types of contracts are not subject to sections 73-807,
73-815, 73-816, and 73-817:
(a) Contracts for services subject to the Nebraska Consultants'
Competitive Negotiation Act;
(b) Contracts for services subject to federal law, regulation, or policy
or state statute, under which a state agency is required to use a different
selection process or to contract with an identified contractor or type of
contractor;
(c) Contracts for professional legal services and services of expert
witnesses, hearing officers, or administrative law judges retained by state
agencies for administrative or court proceedings;
(d) Grant agreements or cooperative agreements;
(e) Contracts with a value of fifteen million dollars or less with direct
providers of medical, behavioral, or developmental health services, child care,
or child welfare services to an individual;
(f) Agreements for services to be performed for a state agency by another
state or local government agency or contracts made by a state agency with a
local government agency for the direct provision of services to the public;
(g) Agreements for services between a state agency and the University of
Nebraska, the Nebraska state colleges, the courts, the Legislature, or other
officers or state agencies established by the Constitution of Nebraska;
(h) Department of Insurance contracts for financial or actuarial
examination, for rehabilitation, conservation, reorganization, or liquidation
of licensees, and for professional services related to residual pools or excess
funds under the agency's control;
(i) Department of Transportation contracts for all road and bridge
-1-

LB180 LB180
2025 2025
projects;
(j) Nebraska Investment Council contracts;
(k) Contracts under section 57-1503;
(l) Contracts for the erection of, construction of, renovation of, repair
of, or addition to any building; for original equipment for any building; for
the construction of any road or bridge; or for the performance of any work
related to such contracts;
(m) Subject to section 83-146, contracts for the purchase or use of the
products of the labor of the inmates of any charitable, reformatory, or penal
institution of the state;
(n) Contracts for leases by the state or a state agency of real property;
(o) Contracts for works of art;
(p) Contracts for advertising or public announcements; and
(q) Direct or miscellaneous purchases pursuant to section 73-814; and .
(r) Department of Natural Resources contracts for all water infrastructure
projects.
Sec. 3. Original sections 73-101 and 73-813, Revised Statutes Cumulative
Supplement, 2024, are repealed.
-2-